North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 24. Trust Companies and Interstate Trust Business.
§ 53-342.
Securities and other investments.

A State trust company may invest its corporate funds in any type or character of equity securities or debt securities subject to the limitations provided by this section.

Unless the Commissioner approves maintenance of a lesser amount, a State trust company shall invest and maintain an amount equal to at least forty percent (40%) of its equity capital in unencumbered cash, cash equivalents, and readily marketable securities.

Subject to subsections (d) and (e) of this section, the total investment in equity and investment securities of any one issuer, obligor, or maker held by a State trust company for its own account shall not exceed an amount equal to fifteen percent (15%) of the State trust company’s equity capital. The Commissioner may authorize investments in excess of this limitation if the Commissioner concludes that the safe and sound operation of a State trust company would not be adversely affected by a proposed investment exceeding this limitation.

In calculating compliance with the investment limits set forth in subsection (c) of this section, a State trust company shall not be required to combine:

The State trust company’s pro rata share of the securities of an issuer in the portfolio of a collective investment vehicle with the State trust company’s pro rata share of the securities of that issuer held by another collective investment vehicle in which the State trust company has invested; or

The State trust company’s own direct investment in the securities of an issuer with the State trust company’s pro rata share of the securities of that issuer held by collective investment vehicles in which the State trust company has invested under the provisions of this section.

Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, a State trust company may purchase for its own account, without limitation and subject only to the exercise of prudent judgment:

Bonds and other general obligations of a state, an agency, or political subdivision of a state, the United States, or an agency or instrumentality of the United States;

A debt security that this State, an agency or political subdivision of this State, the United States, or an agency or instrumentality of the United States has unconditionally agreed to purchase, insure, or guarantee;

Securities that are offered and sold under 15 U.S.C. § 77d(5);

Mortgage-related securities as defined in 15 U.S.C. § 78c(a);

Investment securities issued or guaranteed by the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, Fannie Mae, the Government National Mortgage Association, the Federal Agricultural Mortgage Association, or the Federal Farm Credit Banks Funding Corporation; and

Investment securities issued or guaranteed by the North American Development Bank.

The Commissioner may allow State trust companies to make other investments of its corporate funds not specified in this Subpart by rules, orders, or declaratory rulings.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-343.
Prohibited distributions, acquisitions, liens, or pledges.

A State trust company shall not make any distribution to its shareholders, acquire its own shares, acquire a lien upon its own shares, or pledge its own assets while an order of the Commissioner prohibiting such distributions, acquisitions, liens, or pledges is in effect.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-344.
Subsidiaries.

Before acquiring, establishing, or performing activities through a subsidiary, a State trust company shall file a notice with the Commissioner, in the form required by the Commissioner, describing in detail the proposed activities of the subsidiary, the amount of the State trust company’s proposed investment in the subsidiary, and the State trust company’s proposed ownership interest in the subsidiary.

The State trust company may acquire or establish a subsidiary or begin performing activities in an existing subsidiary 30 days following the date the Commissioner receives the notice, unless the Commissioner:

Establishes an earlier or later date;

Notifies the State trust company that the notice raises issues that require additional information or additional time for analysis; or

Disapproves the acquisition, establishment, or performance of activities through the subsidiary.

If the Commissioner gives a notification described in subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of this section, the State trust company may acquire, establish or conduct activities through the subsidiary only on approval by the Commissioner. The Commissioner may disapprove the subsidiary if the Commissioner finds that the State trust company lacks sufficient resources to undertake the proposed expansion or perform the activity without adversely affecting its safety or soundness.

The Commissioner may make the establishment, acquisition, or performance of new activities through a subsidiary conditional and shall include any such conditions in an order.

The provisions of this section, rather than

G.S. 53-342

, shall apply to the establishment of a subsidiary by a State trust company.

Changes in ownership or control of a subsidiary of a State trust company shall be made only upon the approval of the Commissioner obtained in accordance with the procedures set forth in this section.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-345.
Engaging in commerce prohibited.

Except as otherwise provided by this Part, or by rules, orders, or declaratory rulings of the Commissioner, a State trust company shall not engage in trade or commerce by buying, selling, or otherwise dealing in goods, or by conducting business other than trust business and trust marketing, except as necessary to fulfill a fiduciary obligation to a client.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-346.
Lending and lease financing; conversion to State bank.

Except as may be appropriate for extensions of credit in connection with trust or other account relationships, and as provided in and subject to the provisions of Article 5 of Chapter 36A of the General Statutes and other provisions of applicable law, a State trust company shall not engage in a loan business or in lease financing transactions as the party extending credit.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, a State trust company may, with the approval of the Commissioner, convert to a State bank by following the procedures and requirements set forth in Article 2 of this Chapter, subject to any modifications to those procedures and requirements that are necessary and appropriate for the conversion of a State trust company. The Commissioner may make modifications to procedures or requirements of Article 2 of this Chapter by rule, order or declaratory ruling.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

Subpart D. Ownership; Governance; Mergers.

§ 53-347.
Acquisition of control.

Except as this section otherwise expressly permits, a person shall not, without the approval of the Commissioner, directly or indirectly acquire control of a State trust company.

This Subpart does not prohibit a person from contracting to acquire control of a State trust company subject to required approvals.

This Subpart does not require the approval of the Commissioner for the acquisition of securities in the following circumstances:

The acquisition of securities in connection with securing, collecting, or satisfying a debt previously contracted for in good faith if the acquiring person files notice of acquisition of control with the Commissioner, in the form required by the Commissioner, at least 10 days before the person votes the securities acquired;

The acquisition of additional voting securities in any class or series by a controlling person who previously has complied with and received approval under the provisions of this Article or who was identified as a controlling person in a prior application filed with and approved by the Commissioner if the acquiring person files notice of acquisition of those securities with the Commissioner, in the form required by the Commissioner, at least 10 days before the person votes the securities acquired;

An acquisition or transfer of securities by operation of law, will, or intestate succession if the acquiring person files notice of acquisition of control with the Commissioner, in the form required by the Commissioner, at least 10 days before the person votes the securities acquired;

An acquisition of securities by gift, unless the gift is made for the purpose of circumventing this section, if the acquiring person files notice of acquisition of control with the Commissioner, in the form required by the Commissioner, at least 10 days before the person votes the securities acquired; or

A transaction exempted by the Commissioner by rules, orders, or declaratory rulings because (i) the transaction is not within the purposes of this Article, or (ii) regulation of the transaction is not necessary or appropriate to achieve the objectives of this Article.

Information provided under the provisions of subsection (c) of this section shall be subject to G.S. 53-348(c), and persons providing that information shall be subject to G.S. 53-348(d).

Upon receiving a notice described in subsection (c) of this section, the Commissioner may, on or before the tenth day after the acquiring person files the notice, notify the acquiring person of objection to the voting of securities by the acquiring person or of a request for further information concerning the acquisition of control. If the Commissioner notifies the acquiring person of the objection or request for further information, the acquiring person may vote the shares only on approval by the Commissioner and:

The acquiring person shall follow the procedures prescribed in this Subpart for an application to acquire control of a State trust company;

The Commissioner may request any information that may be requested under the procedures prescribed in this Subpart in connection with an application to acquire control of a State trust company; and

For purposes of determining a quorum of shareholders of a State trust company, the shares shall be treated as authorized but unissued shares unless (i) the Commissioner approves the application to vote the securities or (ii) the acquiring person no longer has the power to vote the shares, either directly or indirectly.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-348.
Application regarding acquisition of control.

A person seeking approval to acquire control of a State trust company shall file with the Commissioner:

An application in the form required by the Commissioner;

Any filing fee required by rule; and

All information required by rule or that the Commissioner requires in connection with a particular application in order to make an informed decision to approve or reject the proposed acquisition of control.

If any group of individuals or entities acting in concert seek approval to acquire control, the information the Commissioner may require under the provisions of this Subpart may be required of each member of the group.

Notwithstanding any laws to the contrary, information bearing on the character or information about the personal finances of an existing or proposed shareholder of a State trust company or other individual is confidential and not subject to public disclosure.

If a person seeking approval to acquire control is not a North Carolina resident, a North Carolina corporation, or an out-of-state corporation qualified to do business in this State, the Commissioner may require the person to appoint a resident agent for service of process.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-349.
Decision on acquisition of control.

Not later than the sixtieth day following receipt of the application, the Commissioner shall either approve or deny the proposed acquisition of control.

The Commissioner may deny an acquisition of control if:

The financial condition of the person seeking approval to acquire control, or any member of a group seeking approval to acquire control, might jeopardize the financial stability of the State trust company or the interests of its clients;

Investigation of the character, competence, general fitness, experience, or integrity of the person seeking approval to acquire control, or any member of a group seeking approval to acquire control, shows that the proposed acquisition of control would not be in the best interests of the clients of the State trust company;

Plans or proposals to operate, liquidate, or sell the State trust company or its assets following the acquisition of control are not in the best interests of the State trust company’s clients;

The State trust company would not be solvent, have adequate equity capital, or be in compliance with the laws of this State after the acquisition of control; or

The person seeking approval to acquire control has failed to furnish all information required by the Commissioner.

If an application filed under the provisions of this section is approved by the Commissioner, the transaction may be consummated. Any written commitment from the person seeking approval to acquire control made as a condition for approval of the application is enforceable against the State trust company and the person acquiring control.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-350.
Appeal.

Any order entered by the Commissioner with respect to an application for acquisition or control of a State trust company shall be subject to review by the Commission for entry of a final agency decision.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-351.
Report of changes in chief executive officer or directors.

Each State trust company shall report to the Commissioner within 48 hours, on the forms and with the information required by the Commissioner, any changes in the chief executive officer or the directors of the State trust company, including in its report a statement of the past and current business and professional affiliations of each new chief executive officer or director.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-352.
Board of directors.

All corporate powers of a State trust company shall be exercised under the authority of, and the business and affairs of a State trust company shall be managed under the direction of, a board of directors. Without the approval of the Commissioner, the board shall consist of not less than five directors. Except as specifically provided otherwise in this section, the number, election, term, and classification of the directors of a State trust company shall be governed by the provisions of Chapter 55 of the General Statutes.

Before each term to which a person is elected to serve as a director of a State trust company, the person shall submit an affidavit for filing in the minutes of the State trust company stating that the person:

Accepts the position;

Will not knowingly violate, or knowingly permit an officer, director, or employee of the State trust company to violate, any law applicable to the conduct of business of the State trust company; and

Will diligently perform the duties of a director.

A person designated with a title such as advisory director is not considered a director if that person:

Is not elected by the shareholders of the State trust company; and

Does not vote on matters before the board of directors or any committee of the board and is not counted for purposes of determining a quorum of the board or any committee of the board.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2011-339, s. 12.

§ 53-353.
Required board meetings.

The board of directors of a State trust company shall hold at least one regular meeting each quarter. At each regular meeting, the board shall review and approve, or disapprove and correct, the minutes of the prior meeting and review the operations, activities, and financial condition of the State trust company. The board may designate committees from among its members to perform these duties and approve or disapprove the committees’ reports at each regular meeting. All material actions of the board shall be recorded in its minutes.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-354.
Officers.

The board of directors shall annually appoint the officers of the State trust company who shall serve at the pleasure of the board. The contract rights of officers, if
any, shall be governed by applicable provisions of Chapter 55 of
the General Statutes and general law. The State trust company shall have a chief executive officer primarily responsible for the execution of board policies and operation of the State trust company. The State trust company also shall
have an officer responsible for the maintenance and storage of all corporate books and records of the State trust company and for required attestation of signatures. These positions shall not be held by the same person. The board may appoint any other officers of the State trust company, including assistants to the officers required by this section, the board considers necessary or appropriate.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-355.
Certain criminal offenses.

An officer, director, employee, or shareholder of a State trust company commits an offense if the person knowingly:

Conceals information or a fact, or removes, destroys, or conceals a book or record of the State trust company for the purpose of concealing information or a fact, from the Commissioner or an agent of the Commissioner; or

For the purpose of concealing information or a fact, removes or destroys any book or record of the State trust company that is material to a pending or anticipated legal or administrative proceeding.

An officer, director, or employee of a State trust company commits an offense if the person knowingly makes a false entry in the books or records or in any report or statement of the State trust company.

An offense under the provisions of this section shall be a Class H felony.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-356.
Responsibility of directors.

The standard of conduct for directors shall be as set forth in

G.S. 55-8-30

.

Any director of a State trust company who shall knowingly violate, or who shall knowingly permit to be violated by any officers, agents, or employees of such State trust company, any of the provisions of this Article shall be held personally and individually liable for all damages which the State trust company, its shareholders, or any other person has sustained in consequence of the violation. Any aggrieved shareholder of any State trust company in liquidation may prosecute an action for the enforcement of the provisions of this section. Only one such action may be brought. The procedure shall follow, as much as possible, that prescribed by Article 3 of Chapter 44A of the General Statutes, relative to suits on bonds of contractors with municipal corporations.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-357.
Record keeping.

A State trust company shall keep its fiduciary records separate and distinct from its other records. The fiduciary records shall contain all material information relative to each account as appropriate under the circumstances.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-358.
Bonding requirements; reports of apparent crime.

The board of directors of a State trust company shall require protection and indemnity for the State trust company and its clients in amounts established by rules, orders, or declaratory rulings of the Commissioner, or otherwise in reasonable amounts, against dishonesty, fraud, defalcation, forgery, theft, and other similar insurable losses, with corporate insurance or surety companies:

Authorized to do business in this State; or

Acceptable to the Commissioner and otherwise lawfully permitted to issue coverage against those losses in this State.

Except as otherwise provided by rules, orders, or declaratory rulings of the Commissioner, coverage required under subsection (a) of this section shall include each director, officer, and employee of the State trust company without regard to whether the person receives salary or other compensation.

A State trust company that is the victim of a robbery, has a shortage of corporate or account assets in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000), or is the victim of an apparent or suspected misapplication of its corporate property or account assets in any amount shall report the robbery, shortage, or apparent or suspected misapplication to the Commissioner within 48 hours after the time it is discovered. The initial report may be oral if a written report is made promptly following the oral report. Neither the State trust company nor any director, officer, employee, or agent of the State trust company is subject to any liability for providing any information in any such report in good faith.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-359.
Merger, share exchange, or asset transfer authority.

With the approval of the Commissioner, a State trust company may merge or exchange its shares with, or acquire or be acquired through a merger or share exchange with, another company, or may transfer to another company all or substantially all of its assets and liabilities, or may acquire from another company all or substantially all of its assets and liabilities.

A merger or share exchange authorized by subsection (a) of this section, shall be governed by Article 11 of Chapter 55 of the General Statutes and

G.S. 53C-7-205

. An acquisition or transfer of assets authorized by subsection (a) of this section shall be governed by Article 12 of Chapter 55 of the General Statutes and

G.S. 53C-7-205

.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2012-56, s. 30.

§ 53-360.
Merger, share exchange, or asset transfer application.

A copy of the proposed articles of merger or share exchange, or asset transfer agreement, and an application in the form required by the Commissioner, shall be filed with the Commissioner. The Commissioner shall investigate the condition of the parties proposing to engage in the merger, share exchange, or asset transfer and may require the submission of additional information.

The Commissioner may approve the merger or share exchange if:

Each resulting trust institution will be solvent and have adequate capitalization;

Each resulting trust institution appears able and ready to comply substantially with the statutes and rules relative to its organization;

Each resulting State trust company will be a “domestic corporation” as that term is defined in G.S. 55-1-40(4);

All fiduciary obligations and liabilities of each trust institution that is a party to the merger, share exchange, or asset transfer have been discharged properly or otherwise have been or will be assumed or retained properly by a person;

Each surviving, new, acquiring, or transferring party that is not authorized to engage in trust business will not engage in trust business and appears able and ready to comply substantially with applicable laws and rules; and

All conditions imposed by the Commissioner have been satisfied or otherwise resolved.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-361.
Notice and investigation of merger, share exchange, or asset transfer; decision, hearing, and appeal.

The Commissioner shall notify the parties to the proposed merger, share exchange, or asset transfer when the application is complete and all required fees have been paid. Promptly following this notification, the parties shall provide notice to clients who may be affected by the proposed merger, share exchange, or asset transfer in the form and manner specified by the Commissioner.

At the expense of the parties to the proposed merger, share exchange, or asset transfer, the Commissioner may investigate the proposed transaction, including the character of the proposed directors, officers, and principal shareholders of each resulting trust institution and of any other person proposed to succeed to the accounts of the applying institutions. Notwithstanding any laws to the contrary, information bearing on the character or information about the personal finances of an existing or proposed organizer, officer, director, or shareholder is confidential and not subject to public disclosure.

Based on the application and investigation, the Commissioner shall enter an order approving or denying approval of the proposed merger, share exchange, or asset transfer not later than the sixtieth day following the date the Commissioner notifies the parties that the application is complete, unless extraordinary circumstances require a longer period of review.

Any written commitment made by a person proposing to engage in the merger, share exchange, or asset transfer as a condition for approval of the application is enforceable against that person.

Any order entered by the Commissioner under the provisions of this section shall be subject to review by the Commission for entry of a final agency decision.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-362.
Appraisal rights of shareholders in mergers, share exchanges, or asset transfers.

A shareholder of a State trust company may exercise appraisal rights in connection with the proposed merger, share exchange, or asset transfer to the extent allowed under, and by following the procedures prescribed by, Article 13 of Chapter 55 of the General Statutes.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2011-347, s. 2.

§ 53-363.
Private trust companies.

The following definitions apply in this Subpart:

“Designated relative” means the individual required to be named in the application under

G.S. 53-364

(a)(5) requesting an exemption from certain provisions of this Act pursuant to

G.S. 53-364

.

“Family member” means the designated relative and

Any individual within the fifth degree of lineal kinship to the designated relative computed in accordance with

G.S. 104A-1

;

Any individual within the ninth degree of collateral kinship to the designated relative computed in accordance with

G.S. 104A-1

;

The spouse of the designated relative and of any individual qualifying as a family member under sub-subdivision a. and b. of this subdivision;

A company controlled by one or more family members;

A trust established by (i) a family member or (ii) an individual who is not a family member if income or principal of the trust could be distributed currently to or for the benefit of a family member;

The estate of a family member; or

A charitable foundation or other charitable entity created by a family member.

For purposes of this subdivision, a legally adopted individual shall be treated as a natural child of the adoptive parents.

“Transact business with the general public” means to engage in any sales, solicitations, arrangements, agreements, or transactions to provide trust business services, whether or not for a fee, commission, or other type of remuneration, to more than 35 persons who are not family members, except that rules, orders, or declaratory rulings of the Commissioner may provide for other circumstances in which a State trust company either does or does not transact business with the general public. For the purposes of this subdivision, an estate, a trust, or any other legal entity having multiple beneficiaries or owners shall be deemed to constitute one person.

A private trust company engaging in trust business in this State shall comply with all provisions of this Article applicable to a State trust company unless expressly exempted from a provision of this Article by the Commissioner pursuant to this section or prior to the enactment of this Article. However, notwithstanding G.S. 53-352(a), the holders of the equity securities of a private trust company may by unanimous agreement limit the authority of its board of directors; restrict, enlarge, or modify the rights or duties of particular directors; or allocate to an individual or group other than the board of directors some or all of the duties of a board of directors. A private trust company shall notify the Commissioner of the adoption of any agreement affecting the authority of the board of directors within 48 hours and shall provide such information as the Commissioner requests about the agreement. To the extent that an individual or group other than the board of directors is vested with the authority of the board of directors under this section, that individual or group shall be deemed to be acting as the board of directors in the exercise of that authority for all purposes of this Chapter.

A private trust company or proposed private trust company may request in writing that it be exempted from specified provisions of G.S. 53-333(b), 53-337(a), 53-339, 53-340, 53-341, 53-342, 53-345, 53-346, and 53-394(b). The Commissioner may grant the exemption request in whole or in part. The Commissioner also may issue rules, orders, or declaratory rulings granting exemptions to all private trust companies, or to private trust companies that meet specified conditions.

The Commissioner may examine or investigate the private trust company or proposed private trust company in connection with the application for exemption. Unless the application presents novel or unusual questions, the Commissioner shall approve or deny the application for exemption no later than the sixty-first day after the date the Commissioner considers the application complete and accepted for filing. The Commissioner may require the submission of additional information in order to make an informed decision to approve or reject the proposed exemption.

Any exemption granted under the provisions of this section may be made subject to conditions or limitations imposed by the Commissioner consistent with this Subpart, and those conditions or limitations shall be included in an order.

Rules, orders, or declaratory rulings of the Commissioner may provide for other circumstances that justify exemption from specific provisions of this Article, specifying the provisions of this Act that are subject to the exemption request, and establishing procedures and requirements for obtaining, maintaining, or revoking exemptions.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2011-339, ss. 13, 14.

§ 53-364.
Requirements to apply for and maintain status as a private trust company.

A private trust company or a proposed private trust company requesting an exemption from the provisions of this Article pursuant to

G.S. 53-363

shall file an application with the Commissioner, in the form required by the Commissioner, containing, preceded, or accompanied by:

An application fee as set by rules of the Commissioner;

A statement under oath of the reasons for requesting the exemption;

A statement under oath showing that the private trust company is not currently transacting business with the general public and that the company will not transact business with the general public without the approval of the Commissioner;

A listing of the specific provisions of the Act from which exemption is requested; and

The name of the designated relative whose relationship to other individuals determines whether the individuals are family members under

G.S. 53-363

(a)(2). The designated relative must be living and 18 years of age or older at the time the application is made.

The Commissioner may make further inquiry and investigation as the Commissioner deems appropriate. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, information bearing on actual or proposed accounts of the private trust company or proposed private trust company applying for the exemption is confidential and not subject to public disclosure.

To maintain its status as a private trust company and to maintain any exemptions from the provisions of this Article granted by the Commissioner, a private trust company shall file with the Commissioner an annual certification that it is in compliance with the provisions of this Subpart and the conditions and limitations of all exemptions granted. This annual certification shall be filed in the form required by the Commissioner and accompanied by any fee required by the Commissioner by rule. The annual certification shall be filed on or before December 31 of each year. The Commissioner may examine or investigate the private trust company periodically as necessary to verify the certification.

In any transaction involving a private trust company for which an application is required under

G.S. 53-360

, any exemption from the provisions of this Article granted to the private trust company shall automatically terminate upon the consummation of the transaction unless the Commissioner approves the continuation of the exemption.

The Commissioner may revoke any exemption from the provisions of this Article granted to a private trust company in the following circumstances:

An officer or director of the private trust company makes a false statement under oath on any document required to be filed by this Article or by any rules or orders of the Commissioner;

The private trust company fails to submit to an examination as required by

G.S. 53-367

;

An officer or director of the private trust company withholds requested information from the Commissioner; or

The private trust company violates any provision of this Subpart or fails to meet any condition on which the exemption is based.

If the Commissioner determines from examination or other credible evidence that a private trust company has violated any of the requirements of this Subpart or fails to meet any condition or limitation on which an exemption from the provisions of this Article is based, the Commissioner may by personal delivery or registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, notify the private trust company that the private trust company’s exemptions from the provisions of this Article will be revoked unless the private trust company corrects the violation or failure or shows cause why any exemptions should not be revoked. The notification shall state grounds for the revocation with reasonable certainty and shall advise of an opportunity for a hearing. The notice shall state the date upon which the revocation shall become effective absent a correction or showing of cause why the exemption should not be revoked, which shall not be before the thirtieth day after the date the notification is mailed or delivered, except as provided in subsection (g) of this section. The revocation shall take effect for the private trust company on the date stated in the notice if the private trust company does not request a hearing in writing before the effective date. After the revocation takes effect, the private trust company shall be subject to all of the requirements and provisions of this Article applicable to a State trust company.

If the Commissioner determines from examination or other credible evidence that a private trust company appears to be engaging or attempting to engage in acts intended, designed, or likely to deceive or defraud the public, the Commissioner may shorten or eliminate the 30-day notice period specified in subsection (f) of this section, but shall promptly afford a subsequent hearing upon request to rescind the action taken.

If the private trust company does not comply with all of the provisions of this Article or correct any failure to meet any condition or limitation on which an exemption is based within the notice period specified in subsection (f) of this section, the Commissioner may institute any action or remedy prescribed by this Article or any applicable rule.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-365.
Conversion to public trust company.

Before transacting business with the general public, a private trust company shall file a notice on a form prescribed by the Commissioner, which shall set forth the name of the private trust company and an acknowledgment that any exemption granted or otherwise applicable to the private trust company pursuant to

G.S. 53-363

shall cease to apply once the Commissioner terminates private trust company status. The private trust company shall furnish a copy of the resolution adopted by its board of directors authorizing the private trust company to commence transacting business with the general public, and shall pay the filing fee, if any, prescribed by rule of the Commissioner.

The private trust company may commence transacting business with the general public on the thirty-first day after the date the Commissioner receives the notice, unless the Commissioner:

Establishes an earlier or later date;

Notifies the private trust company that the notice raises issues that require additional information or additional time for analysis; or

Disapproves the termination of private trust company status.

If the Commissioner gives a notification described in subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of this section, the private trust company status may be terminated only on approval by the Commissioner.

The Commissioner may deny approval of the proposed termination of private trust company status if the Commissioner finds that the private trust company lacks sufficient resources to undertake the proposed conversion without adversely affecting its safety or soundness or if the Commissioner determines that the private trust company could not within a reasonable period be in compliance with any provision of this Article from which it previously had been exempted pursuant to

G.S. 53-363

.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

Part 4. Applicable Law; Enforcement Actions.

Subpart A. Supervision and Examination.